Utah statutes.
76-10-711.   Foreign corporations subject to laws.

It is no defense to a prosecution for a violation of any of the provisions of this part that the corporation was one created by the laws of another state, government, or country if it was one carrying on business or keeping an office therefor within this state.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

